Utah statutes.
24-1-10.   Prejudgment and postjudgment interest.
In any proceeding to forfeit currency or other negotiable instruments under
this chapter, the court shall award a prevailing party prejudgment and
postjudgment interest on the currency or negotiable instruments at the legal
rate of interest established by Section 15-1-1.
